Maryland, session 2025, SB0539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
1–230.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A PARENT
PRESENTS A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER AUTHORIZED TO PRESCRIBE UNDER THIS
ARTICLE WITH A COURT–ORDERED OR COURT–APPROVED SHARED CUSTODY OR
VISITATION SCHEDULE, THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL ISSUE TWO
PRESCRIPTIONS FOR EACH DRUG THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER PRESCRIBES FOR A
CHILD OF THE PARENT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0539*

SENATE BILL 539
(2) THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL:
(I) ISSUE A PRESCRIPTION TO BE FILLED BY EACH PARENT;
AND
(II) WRITE EACH PRESCRIPTION FOR AN AMOUNT OF THE DRUG
THAT IS PROPORTIONATE TO THE AMOUNT OF TIME THAT THE PARENT SPENDS WITH
THE CHILD IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE COURT–ORDERED OR COURT–APPROVED
SHARED CUSTODY OR VISITATION SCHEDULE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF A PARENT
PRESENTS A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER AUTHORIZED TO DISPENSE PRESCRIPTION
DRUGS OR DEVICES UNDER THIS ARTICLE WITH A COURT–ORDERED OR
COURT–APPROVED SHARED CUSTODY OR VISITATION SCHEDULE AND A
PRESCRIPTION ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER SHALL FILL THE PRESCRIPTION.
(2) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER AUTHORIZED TO DISPENSE
PRESCRIPTION DRUGS OR DEVICES UNDER THIS ARTICLE MAY FILL FOR THE
PARENT ONLY THE PRESCRIPTION THAT IS FOR THE AMOUNT OF THE DRUG THAT IS
PROPORTIONATE TO THE TIME THAT THE PARENT SPENDS WITH THE CHILD IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE COURT–ORDERED OR COURT–APPROVED SHARED
CUSTODY OR VISITATION SCHEDULE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.